Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$3,926,618 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts
and reimbursements from federal service agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds not described in this section, collected or received by the Oregon Government  Ethics
Commission.
SECTION 2.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Passed by House April 14, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate April 26, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5021 (HB 5021-A) Page 1